Oklahoma, session 2025, SB449.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3034.1, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3034.1. A. As used in this act Section 3034 et seq. of


this title, a “rainy day fund” shall be a cash account to pay for


unforeseen future emergencies unforeseen circumstances or loss in


revenue for the county budget. The rainy day fund shall be funded


with surplus funds or monies receipted over and above the itemized


estimate of needs for the general fund. Such transfers from the


surplus funds shall occur at the time of the budget approval


appropriated from excess revenue collections from the previous


fiscal year and enumerated as a budgeted item with a dedicated line

Req. No. 1183 Page 1


item identified in the chart of accounts and shall not be combined


with other expenses of the county. The transfer of appropriations


to the rainy day fund shall be conducted after the budget is


approved. The balance of the rainy day fund shall not be part of


the general budget within the estimate of needs but shall be


recorded on the estimate of needs as a special fund. When the


county has excess funds, the county may by resolution deposit the


funds in the rainy day fund. However, after After funds are so


transferred, they are not transferable back to the original source.


The rainy day fund may contain up to, but not more than, fifty


percent (50%) of the previous year’s approved budget.


B. 1. Up to one-half (1/2) of the balance of the rainy day


fund may be used for natural disasters that are declared such by the


Governor, board of county commissioners or by the federal


government. Such expenditures must be spent in accordance with


Section 1500 et seq. of Title 19 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


2. Up to one-eighth (1/8) one-quarter (1/4) of the balance of


the rainy day fund may be used to supplement the county’s current


general budget if it is less than the previous year’s budget as


revenue for the general budget if determined necessary by the


governing board. Revenue from the rainy day fund may be applied


during the original approved budget or mid-year with an amended


budget. The amount required must be clearly identified as a revenue


source within the budget, and the funds shall be transferred from

Req. No. 1183 Page 2


the rainy day fund to the general fund after the budget is approved


and certified.


3. Up to one-eighth (1/8) of the balance of the rainy day fund


may be used to supplement the current year’s revenue when


collections come in shorter than estimated and a revenue failure is


declared by the board of county commissioners ten percent (10%) of


the balance of the rainy day fund may be expended by resolution of


the board for exigent circumstances.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 3034.2, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 3034.2. A. As used in this act Section 3034 et seq. of


this title, a “capital reserve fund” shall be a cash account, which


may be used to pay for long-term capital needs of the county. The


capital reserve fund shall be funded appropriated from the general


budget or other legal source. When funded from the general budget,


a dedicated line item shall be used to identify the expenditure in


the chart of accounts and not be combined with other expenses of the


county. The balance of the capital reserve fund shall not be part


of the general budget within the estimate of needs but shall be


recorded on the estimate of needs as a special fund. When the


county has excess funds money from other sources than the general


budget, the county may by resolution deposit the funds in the


capital reserve fund. However, after the funds are so transferred,


they are not transferable back to the original source.

Req. No. 1183 Page 3


B. Expenditures may be made out of the capital reserve fund as


needed and determined by the board of authority. Expenditures are


limited to county facilities. Such expenditures must be spent in


accordance with Section 1500 et seq. of Title 19 of the Oklahoma


Statutes.


C. The Office of the State Auditor and Inspector may establish


proper documents and procedures.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2025.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-1-1183 MSBB 1/19/2025 5:36:36 AM





















Req. No. 1183 Page 4